Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 22.1. The Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002.
§ 56-575.9.
Comprehensive agreement.

Prior to developing or operating the qualifying project, the private entity shall enter into a comprehensive agreement with the responsible public entity. The comprehensive agreement shall provide for:

Delivery of maintenance, performance and payment bonds, letters of credit in connection with the development or operation of the qualifying project, in the forms and amounts satisfactory to the responsible public entity and in compliance with §

2.2-4337

for those components of the qualifying project that involve construction;

Review of plans and specifications for the qualifying project by the responsible public entity and approval by the responsible public entity if the plans and specifications conform to standards acceptable to the responsible public entity. This shall not
be construed as requiring the private entity to complete design of a qualifying project prior to the execution of a comprehensive agreement;

Inspection of the qualifying project by the responsible public entity to ensure that the private entity’s activities are acceptable to the responsible public entity in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive agreement;

Maintenance of a policy or policies of public liability insurance (copies of which shall be filed with the responsible public entity accompanied by proofs of coverage) or self-insurance, each in form and amount satisfactory to the responsible public entity
and reasonably sufficient to insure coverage of tort liability to the public and employees and to enable the continued operation of the qualifying project;

Monitoring of the practices of the private entity by the responsible public entity to ensure that the qualifying project is properly maintained;

Reimbursement to be paid to the responsible public entity for services provided by the responsible public entity;

Filing of appropriate financial statements on a periodic basis; and

Policies and procedures governing the rights and responsibilities of the responsible public entity and the private entity in the event the comprehensive agreement is terminated or there is a material default by the private entity. Such policies and guidelines
shall include conditions governing assumption of the duties and responsibilities of the private entity by the responsible public entity and the transfer or purchase of property or other interests of the private entity by
the responsible public entity.

The comprehensive agreement shall provide for such user fees, lease payments, or service payments as may be established from time to time by agreement of the parties. A copy of any service contract shall be filed with the responsible public entity. In
negotiating user fees under this section, the parties shall establish payments or fees that are the same for persons using the facility under like conditions and that will not materially discourage use of the qualifying project.
The execution of the comprehensive agreement or any amendment thereto shall constitute conclusive evidence that the user fees, lease payments, or service payments provided for comply with this chapter. User fees or lease payments
established in the comprehensive agreement as a source of revenues may be in addition to, or in lieu of, service payments.

In the comprehensive agreement, the responsible public entity may agree to make grants or loans to the private entity from time to time from amounts received from the federal, state, or local government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

The comprehensive agreement shall incorporate the duties of the private entity under this chapter and may contain such other terms and conditions that the responsible public entity determines serve the public purpose of this chapter. Without limitation,
the comprehensive agreement may contain provisions under which the responsible public entity agrees to provide notice of default and cure rights for the benefit of the private entity and the persons specified therein as providing
financing for the qualifying project. The comprehensive agreement may contain such other lawful terms and conditions to which the private entity and the responsible public entity mutually agree, including, without limitation, provisions
regarding unavoidable delays or provisions providing for a loan of public funds to the private entity to develop or operate one or more qualifying projects. The comprehensive agreement may also contain provisions where the authority
and duties of the private entity under this chapter shall cease, and the qualifying project is dedicated to the responsible public entity or, if the qualifying project was initially dedicated by an affected local jurisdiction,
to such affected local jurisdiction for public use.

Any changes in the terms of the comprehensive agreement, as may be agreed upon by the parties from time to time, shall be added to the comprehensive agreement by written amendment.

When a responsible public entity that is not an agency or authority of the Commonwealth enters into a comprehensive agreement pursuant to this chapter, it shall within 30 days thereafter submit a copy of the comprehensive agreement to the Auditor of Public
Accounts.

The comprehensive agreement may provide for the development or operation of phases or segments of the qualifying project.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, c. 1034; 2004, c. 986; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, substituted “operating, implementing, or installing” for “or operating” in subsection A; substituted “operation, implementation, or installation” for “or operation” in subdivision A 1; substituted “operate, implement, or
install” for “or operate” in subsection D; and substituted “30” for “thirty” in subsection F.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 986 added the language beginning “and in compliance with” at the end of subdivision A 1.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 rewrote subdivisions A and A 1, substituted “private entity” for “operator” throughout, substituted “or self-insurance, each” for “self-insurance” in subdivision A 4, substituted “guidelines” for “procedures” in subdivision
A 8, substituted “develop or operate” for “acquire, design, construct, improve, renovate, expand, equip, maintain, operate, implement, or install” in the third sentence of subsection D and added subsection G.

§ 56-575.9:1.
Interim agreement.

Prior to or in connection with the negotiation of the comprehensive agreement, the responsible public entity may enter into an interim agreement with the private entity proposing the development or operation of the qualifying project. Such interim agreement
may (i) permit the private entity to commence activities for which it may be compensated relating to the proposed qualifying project, including, but not limited to, project planning and development, design and engineering, environmental
analysis and mitigation, survey, and ascertaining the availability of financing for the proposed facility or facilities; (ii) establish the process and timing of the negotiation of the comprehensive agreement; and (iii) contain any
other provisions related to any aspect of the development or operation of a qualifying project that the parties may deem appropriate.

History.
2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

§ 56-575.10.
Federal, state and local assistance.

Any financing of a qualifying facility may be in such amounts and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the parties to the interim or comprehensive agreement. Without limiting the generality of the terms and conditions of the financing,
the private entity and the responsible public entity may propose to utilize any and all funding resources that may be available to them and may, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, issue debt, equity, or other securities
or obligations, enter into leases, access any designated trust funds, borrow or accept grants from any state infrastructure bank, and secure any financing with a pledge of, security interest in, or lien on, any or all of its property,
including all of its property interests in the qualifying facility.

The responsible public entity may take any action to obtain federal, state, or local assistance for a qualifying project that serves the public purpose of this chapter and may enter into any contracts required to receive such assistance. If the responsible
public entity is a state agency, any funds received from the state or federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof shall be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly. The responsible public entity may determine
that it serves the public purpose of this chapter for all or any portion of the costs of a qualifying project to be paid, directly or indirectly, from the proceeds of a grant or loan made by the local, state, or federal government
or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 designated the former undesignated single paragraph as present subsection B and added the present subsection A.

§ 56-575.11.
Material default; remedies.

In the event of a material default by the private entity, the responsible public entity may elect to assume the responsibilities and duties of the private entity of the qualifying project, and in such case, it shall succeed to all of the right, title
and interest in such qualifying project, subject to any liens on revenues previously granted by the private entity to any person providing financing thereof.

Any responsible public entity having the power of condemnation under state law may exercise such power of condemnation to acquire the qualifying project in the event of a material default by the private entity. Any person who has provided financing for
the qualifying project, and the private entity, to the extent of its capital investment, may participate in the condemnation proceedings with the standing of a property owner.

The responsible public entity may terminate, with cause, the interim or comprehensive agreement and exercise any other rights and remedies that may be available to it at law or in equity.

The responsible public entity may make or cause to be made any appropriate claims under the maintenance, performance, or payment bonds; or lines of credit required by subsection A 1 of § 56-575.9.

In the event the responsible public entity elects to take over a qualifying project pursuant to subsection A, the responsible public entity may develop or operate the qualifying project, impose user fees, impose and collect lease payments for the use
thereof and comply with any service contracts as if it were the private entity. Any revenues that are subject to a lien shall be collected for the benefit of and paid to secured parties, as their interests may appear, to the extent
necessary to satisfy the private entity’s obligations to secured parties, including the maintenance of reserves. Such liens shall be correspondingly reduced and, when paid off, released. Before any payments to, or for the benefit
of, secured parties, the responsible public entity may use revenues to pay current operation and maintenance costs of the qualifying project, including compensation to the responsible public entity for its services in operating
and maintaining the qualifying project. The right to receive such payment, if any, shall be considered just compensation for the qualifying project. The full faith and credit of the responsible public entity shall not be pledged
to secure any financing of the private entity by the election to take over the qualifying project. Assumption of operation of the qualifying project shall not obligate the responsible public entity to pay any obligation of the
private entity from sources other than revenues.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, c. 1034; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, substituted “maintain, implement, or install” for “or maintain” in the first sentence of subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “private entity” for “operator” throughout, inserted “interim or” in subsection C, and substituted “develop or operate” for “acquire, design, construct, improve, renovate, operate, expand, equip, maintain, implement,
or install” in subsection E.

§ 56-575.12.
Condemnation.

At the request of the private entity, the responsible public entity may exercise any power of condemnation that it has under law for the purpose of acquiring any lands or estates or interests therein to the extent that the responsible public entity finds
that such action serves the public purpose of this chapter. Any amounts to be paid in any such condemnation proceeding shall be paid by the private entity.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “private entity” for “operator” in two places.

§ 56-575.13.
Utility crossing.

The private entity and each public service company, public utility, railroad, and cable television provider, whose facilities are to be crossed or affected shall cooperate fully with the other entity in planning and arranging the manner of the crossing
or relocation of the facilities. Any such entity possessing the power of condemnation is hereby expressly granted such powers in connection with the moving or relocation of facilities to be crossed by the qualifying project or that
must be relocated to the extent that such moving or relocation is made necessary or desirable by construction of, renovation to, or improvements to the qualifying project, which shall be construed to include construction of, renovation
to, or improvements to temporary facilities for the purpose of providing service during the period of construction or improvement. Any amount to be paid for such crossing, construction, moving or relocating of facilities shall be paid
for by the private entity. Should the private entity and any such public service company, public utility, railroad, and cable television provider not be able to agree upon a plan for the crossing or relocation, the Commission may determine
the manner in which the crossing or relocation is to be accomplished and any damages due arising out of the crossing or relocation. The Commission may employ expert engineers who shall examine the location and plans for such crossing
or relocation, hear any objections and consider modifications, and make a recommendation to the Commission. In such a case, the cost of the experts is to be borne by the private entity. Such determination shall be made by the Commission
within ninety days of notification by the private entity that the qualifying project will cross utilities subject to the Commission’s jurisdiction.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2005, c. 865.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “private entity” for “operator” throughout the section.

§ 56-575.14.
Police powers; violations of law.

All police officers of the Commonwealth and of each affected local jurisdiction shall have the same powers and jurisdiction within the limits of such qualifying project as they have in their respective areas of jurisdiction and such police officers shall
have access to the qualifying project at any time for the purpose of exercising such powers and jurisdiction.

History.
2002, c. 571.

§ 56-575.15.
Sovereign immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as or deemed a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the Commonwealth, any responsible public entity or any affected local jurisdiction or any officer or employee thereof with respect to the participation in, or
approval of all or any part of the qualifying project or its operation, including but not limited to interconnection of the qualifying project with any other infrastructure or project. Counties, cities and towns in which a qualifying
project is located shall possess sovereign immunity with respect to its design, construction, and operation.

History.
2002, c. 571.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Sovereign immunity did not bar contract claims. —

Virginia Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act (PEFIA), specifically § 56-575.15, stated that it should not be construed as waiving sovereign immunity for any public entity participating in a qualifying project under the Act, but
the defense of sovereign immunity had never been extended to actions based upon valid contracts entered into by duly authorized agents of the government; thus, the PEFIA did not affect the Commonwealth’s contract liability for contracts
in which the developers exchanged their expertise in the technology sector for an interest in the development of a university building as the PEFIA preserved the status quo, in which the Commonwealth was exposed to such types of contract
liability. Geographic Network Affiliates-International, Inc. v. Enter. for Empowerment Found., 69 Va. Cir. 428, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 94 (Norfolk Jan. 12, 2006).

§ 56-575.16.
Procurement.

The Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) and any interpretations, regulations, or guidelines of the Division of Engineering and Buildings of the Department of General Services or the Virginia Information Technologies Agency, including the Capital Outlay
Manual and those interpretations, regulations or guidelines developed pursuant to §§

2.2-1131

,

2.2-1132

,

2.2-1133

,

2.2-1149

, and

2.2-1502

, except those developed by the Division or the Virginia Information Technologies Agency in accordance with this chapter when the Commonwealth is the responsible public entity, shall not apply to this chapter. However,
a responsible public entity may enter into a comprehensive agreement only in accordance with guidelines adopted by it as follows:

A responsible public entity may enter into a comprehensive agreement in accordance with guidelines adopted by it that are consistent with procurement through competitive sealed bidding as set forth in §

2.2-4302.1

and subsection B of §

2.2-4310

.

A responsible public entity may enter into a comprehensive agreement in accordance with guidelines adopted by it that are consistent with the procurement of “other than professional services” through competitive negotiation as set forth in §

2.2-4302.2

and subsection B of §

2.2-4310

. Such responsible public entity shall not be required to select the proposal with the lowest price offer, but may consider price as one factor in evaluating the proposals received. Other factors that may be considered
include (i) the proposed cost of the qualifying facility; (ii) the general reputation, industry experience, and financial capacity of the private entity; (iii) the proposed design of the qualifying project; (iv) the eligibility
of the facility for accelerated selection, review, and documentation timelines under the responsible public entity’s guidelines; (v) local citizen and government comments; (vi) benefits to the public; (vii) the private entity’s
compliance with a minority business enterprise participation plan or good faith effort to comply with the goals of such plan; (viii) the private entity’s plans to employ local contractors and residents; and (ix) other criteria
that the responsible public entity deems appropriate.A responsible public entity shall proceed in accordance with the guidelines adopted by it pursuant to subdivision 1 unless it determines that proceeding in accordance with the
guidelines adopted by it pursuant to this subdivision is likely to be advantageous to the responsible public entity and the public, based on (i) the probable scope, complexity, or priority of the project; (ii) risk sharing including
guaranteed cost or completion guarantees, added value or debt or equity investments proposed by the private entity; or (iii) an increase in funding, dedicated revenue source or other economic benefit that would not otherwise be
available. When the responsible public entity determines to proceed according to the guidelines adopted by it pursuant to this subdivision, it shall state the reasons for its determination in writing. If a state agency is the responsible
public entity, the approval of the responsible Governor’s Secretary, or the Governor, shall be required before the responsible public entity may enter into a comprehensive agreement pursuant to this subdivision.

Nothing in this chapter shall authorize or require that a responsible public entity obtain professional services through any process except in accordance with guidelines adopted by it that are consistent with the procurement of “professional services”
through competitive negotiation as set forth in §

2.2-4302.2

and subsection B of §

2.2-4310

.

A responsible public entity shall not proceed to consider any request by a private entity for approval of a qualifying project until the responsible public entity has adopted and made publicly available guidelines pursuant to § 56-575.3:1 that are sufficient
to enable the responsible public entity to comply with this chapter.

A responsible public entity that is a school board or a county, city, or town may enter into an interim or comprehensive agreement under this chapter only with the approval of the local governing body.

History.
2002, c. 571; 2003, cc. 292, 968, 1034; 2004, c. 986; 2005, c. 865; 2006, c. 936; 2007, c. 764; 2013, c. 583.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 865, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to existing and prospective qualifying projects.”

Acts 2013, c. 583, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 292 in subdivision 4, substituted “determined by the responsible public entity to be appropriate to encourage competition and public-private partnerships pursuant to the goals of this chapter, such reasonable period not to be
less than 45” for “to be no less than forty-five” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2003 amendment by c. 968 substituted “45” for “forty-five” in subdivision 4; inserted subdivision 5; and redesignated former subdivision 5 as present subdivision 6.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1034, twice inserted “or the Virginia Information Technologies Agency” in the introductory language; and substituted “45” for “forty-five” in subdivision 4.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 986, in subdivision 4, inserted designations; added subdivision 4 a; substituted “also require advertising the public notice” for “include advertising such notice” and deleted “in the case of a state agency” in the last paragraph
and made related changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 865 substituted “guidelines” for “procedures” throughout, added the last sentence in subdivision 2, rewrote the undesignated paragraph following subdivision 2, and substituted “an interim” for “a” in subdivision 6.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 936 deleted former subdivision 5, relating to making procurement records available after an agreement has been reached, and redesignated former subdivision 6 as subdivision 5.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 764 rewrote subdivision 4.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 583, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “set forth in §

2.2-4302.1

” for “defined in §

2.2-4301

” in subdivision 1; substituted “set forth in §

2.2-4302.2

” for “defined in §

2.2-4301

” in subdivisions 2 and 3.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A school board acting as a responsible public entity

has authority to enter into a comprehensive agreement under the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002 only after having received approval from the local governing body. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Harry
J. Parrish, Member, House of Delegates, 04-011, (3/24/04).

A school board may act as a responsible public entity

under the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Harry J. Parrish, Member, House of Delegates, 04-011, (3/24/04).

Authority to enter into contracts. —

The General Assembly has authorized the Virginia Information Technologies Agency, rather than the Information Technology Investment Board, to enter into or modify contracts for the purchase of information technology goods and services. See opinion of
Attorney General to The Honorable Samuel A. Nixon, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 09-053, (8/14/09).

§ 56-575.17.
Posting of conceptual proposals; public comment; public access to procurement records.

Conceptual proposals submitted in accordance with subsection A or B of § 56-575.4 to a responsible public entity shall be posted by the responsible public entity within 10 working days after acceptance of such proposals as follows:

For responsible public entities that are state agencies, authorities, departments, institutions, and other units of state government, posting shall be on the Department of General Services’ centralized electronic procurement website; and

For responsible public entities that are local bodies, posting shall be on the responsible public entity’s website or on the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website. In addition, such public bodies may publish in a newspaper
of general circulation in the area in which the contract is to be performed a summary of the proposals and the location where copies of the proposals are available for public inspection. Such local public bodies are encouraged
to utilize the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website to provide the public with centralized visibility and access to the Commonwealth’s procurement opportunities.In addition to the posting
requirements, at least one copy of the proposals shall be made available for public inspection. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the posting of the conceptual proposals by additional means deemed appropriate
by the responsible public entity so as to provide maximum notice to the public of the opportunity to inspect the proposals. Trade secrets, financial records, or other records of the private entity excluded from disclosure
under the provisions of subdivision 11 of §

2.2-3705.6

shall not be required to be posted, except as otherwise agreed to by the responsible public entity and the private entity.

The responsible public entity shall hold a public hearing on the proposals during the proposal review process, but not later than 30 days prior to entering into an interim or comprehensive agreement.

Once the negotiation phase for the development of an interim or a comprehensive agreement is complete, but before an interim agreement or a comprehensive agreement is entered into, a responsible public entity shall make available the proposed agreement
in a manner provided in subsection A.

Once an interim agreement or a comprehensive agreement has been entered into, a responsible public entity shall make procurement records available for public inspection, upon request. For the purposes of this subsection, procurement records shall not
be interpreted to include (i) trade secrets of the private entity as defined in the Uniform Trade Secrets Act (§ 59.1-336 et seq.) or (ii) financial records, including balance sheets or financial statements of the private entity
that are not generally available to the public through regulatory disclosure or otherwise.

Cost estimates relating to a proposed procurement transaction prepared by or for a responsible public entity shall not be open to public inspection.

Any inspection of procurement transaction records under this section shall be subject to reasonable restrictions to ensure the security and integrity of the records.

The provisions of this section shall apply to accepted proposals regardless of whether the process of bargaining will result in an interim or a comprehensive agreement.

History.
2006, c. 936; 2008, c. 667; 2009, c. 762; 2011, c. 332.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 762, cl. 2, provides: “That the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on General Laws and Technology and the House Committee on General Laws shall convene a working group to meet at least annually to review the model guidelines used by responsible
public entities for consideration of proposals under the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002 (§ 56-575.1 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia and to consider best practices recommendations for use by responsible
public entities. The findings of the working group shall be reported to the Chairman of each respective Committee on or before September 30 of each year.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 667, in subsection B, substituted “at least 30 days” for “for 30 days” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “hold a public hearing” for “provide an oppurtunity for public comment” near the end of the first sentence,
deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The public comment period required by this subsection may include a public hearing in the sole discretion of the responsible public entity,” and substituted “public hearing is held”
for “end of the public comment period” near the end of the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 762 rewrote former subsection B, which read: “In addition to the posting requirements of subsection A, at least 30 days prior to entering into an interim or comprehensive agreement, a responsible public entity shall hold a public
hearing on the proposals. After the public hearing is held, no additional posting shall be required.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 332, substituted “authorities, departments, institutions, and other units of state government, posting shall be on the Department of General Services’ centralized electronic procurement website” for “departments, and institutions,
posting shall be on the Department of General Service’s web-based electronic procurement program commonly known as ‘eVA;”’ in subdivision A 1; and rewrote subdivision A 2.

§ 56-575.17:1.
Contributions and gifts; prohibition during approval process.

No private entity that has submitted a bid or proposal to a public entity that is an executive branch agency directly responsible to the Governor and is seeking to develop or operate a qualifying project pursuant to this chapter, and no individual who
is an officer or director of such a private entity, shall knowingly provide a contribution, gift, or other item with a value greater than $50 or make an express or implied promise to make such a contribution or gift to the Governor,
his political action committee, or the Governor’s Secretaries, if the Secretary is responsible to the Governor for an executive branch agency with jurisdiction over the matters at issue, following the submission of a proposal under
this chapter until the execution of a comprehensive agreement thereunder. The provisions of this section shall apply only for any proposal or an interim or comprehensive agreement where the stated or expected value of the contract
is $5 million or more.

Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of $500 or up to two times the amount of the contribution or gift, whichever is greater. The attorney for the Commonwealth shall initiate civil proceedings to enforce the
civil penalties. Any civil penalties collected shall be payable to the State Treasurer for deposit to the general fund.

History.
2010, c. 732; 2011, c. 624.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 624, in the first sentence in subsection A, inserted “that is an executive branch agency directly responsible to the Governor” and “executive branch”; and in subsection B, inserted “knowingly.”

§ 56-575.18.
Auditor of Public Accounts.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall periodically review interim and comprehensive agreements entered into pursuant to this chapter to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter. Copies of the agreements and supporting documents must be electronically
filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts. Electronic agreements shall be made available in the online database maintained pursuant to § 30-133.

History.
2007, c. 764; 2009, c. 762.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 762, cl. 2 provides: “That the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on General Laws and Technology and the House Committee on General Laws shall convene a working group to meet at least annually to review the model guidelines used by responsible
public entities for consideration of proposals under the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act of 2002 (§ 56-575.1 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia and to consider best practices recommendations for use by responsible
public entities. The findings of the working group shall be reported to the Chairman of each respective Committee on or before September 30 of each year.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 762 added the last two sentences.